Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF390.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 15.17, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Enforcement; penalties. new text end new text begin The remedies, procedures, and penalties provided in sections 13.08 and 13.085 apply to a violation of this section. new text end